Illinois, session 104th, SB1539.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Regional Transportation Authority Act is 5amended by adding Section 3A.17.5 as follows: 6    (70 ILCS 3615/3A.17.5 new)7    Sec. 3A.17.5. Responsible bidding plan.8    (a) The Suburban Bus Board shall adopt responsible bidding 9rules applicable to bids for contracts solicited for drivers, 10dispatchers, customer service aides, and reservationists.11    (b) A bidder must submit the following information and 12supporting documentation verified under oath on a form 13designated by the Suburban Bus Board before the bidder may be 14considered a responsible bidder under the rules adopted by the 15Suburban Bus Board:16        (1) A copy of the Illinois Secretary of State's 17    Department of Business Services online records evidencing 18    that the bidder has a current corporate annual report on 19    file. This paragraph does not apply to a bidder who is an 20    individual, sole proprietor, or partnership.21        (2) Documents evidencing current registration with the 22    Department of Revenue if the bidder has employees.23        (3) Disclosure of any federal, state, or local tax   SB1539- 2 -LRB104 10657 RTM 20734 b1    liens or tax delinquencies against the contractor or any 2    officers of the contractor in the last 5 years;3        (4) A statement that all employees are covered under a 4    current workers' compensation insurance policy and 5    properly classified under such policy.6        (5) A statement of compliance with all provisions of 7    the Illinois Prevailing Wage Act and all rules and 8    regulations adopted under the Illinois Prevailing Wage Act 9    for the past 5 years.10        (6) Documents evidencing any professional or trade 11    license required by law or local ordinance for any trade 12    or specialty area in which the contractor is seeking a 13    contract award.14        (7) Evidence of participation in apprenticeship 15    training programs applicable to the work to be performed 16    on the project, which are approved by and registered with 17    the U.S. Department of Labor's Office of Apprenticeship, 18    or its successor organization.19        (8) Certification that all employees expected to 20    perform work on the project have completed a 10-hour or 21    greater OSHA safety program.22        (9) Disclosure of the name and address of each 23    subcontractor from whom the contractor has accepted a bid 24    or intends to hire on any part of the project.25        (10) Statements as to past performance, which shall 26    give an accurate and complete record of all contracts   SB1539- 3 -LRB104 10657 RTM 20734 b1    completed in the past 3 years by the contractor.2        (11) Evidence that the bidder does not have any 3    unremedied or unresolved violations of any applicable 4    State, county, local, or federal labor laws, including a 5    finding of merit for an unfair labor practice charge by 6    any Region of the National Labor Relations Board.7    (c) It is the sole responsibility of the bidder to comply 8with all submission requirements at the time it submits its 9bid to the Suburban Bus Board. Bidder submissions deemed 10inadequate or incomplete may result in a determination that 11the bidder is not a responsible bidder. The submission 12requirements also apply to all subcontractors, except that the 13successful bidder shall submit all subcontractor submissions 14to the Suburban Bus Board prior to the subcontractor 15commencing work on the project.16    (d) Upon designation by the Suburban Bus Board that a 17contractor's or subcontractor's submission in anticipation of 18a bid is complete and timely, and upon any further 19consideration deemed necessary by the Suburban Bus Board, the 20contractor or subcontractor may be prequalified for future 21contracts with the Suburban Bus Board. A contractor's 22classification as qualified shall exempt the contractor or 23sub-contractor from the submission requirements contained in 24this Section for a period of 12 months. Contractors and 25subcontractors who are prequalified must submit a complete 26application for continuation of prequalified standing on a   SB1539- 4 -LRB104 10657 RTM 20734 b1form provided by the Suburban Bus Board by December 31st for 2the upcoming calendar year. Failure by any prequalified 3contractor or subcontractor to timely submit its complete 4application for continuation of prequalified standing shall 5result in automatic removal of the designation, effective 6January 1st of the following year. However, the contractor or 7subcontractor removed from prequalified status shall still be 8permitted to bid on Suburban Bus Board contracts.